Utah statutes.
58-83-307.   Approval of additional drugs -- Request to facilitate.

(1)  An Internet facilitator licensed under this chapter may seek the division's approval to facilitate the online prescribing and dispensing of prescriptions for additional drugs.

(2)  The Internet facilitator shall make a request for approval of additional drugs by petitioning for an amendment to the administrative rule adopted by the division in accordance with Section 58-83-306 and Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

